Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.085

Office of the education ombuds—Notification.

Institutional education providers must comply with the requirements in RCW 28A.600.510(1), related to provision of information about the office of the education ombuds.

[ 2022 c 222 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 222: See note following RCW 28A.600.510.